Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB636.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8904(3) of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 8904. Duty of commission.The commission shall:* * *(3) Review at least once every [five] 10 years all determinations of need for exemptions from the payment of real estate taxes which have been granted in order to determine any changes in the economic status of applicants bearing upon the question of need.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617